Hawaii statutes.
§88-138 Accidental death benefit. If a
service member dies by accident, act of war, or other cause, occurring while
the service member is not in the active service of the State or any county, the
death shall not be an accidental death and shall not be eligible for accidental
death benefits under sections 88-85, 88-286(c), and 88-339; however, the
ordinary death benefit shall be payable as provided in section 88-137. [L 1951,
c 262, pt of §3; RL 1955, §6-117; HRS §88-128; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; gen
ch 1985; am L 2004, c 179, §21; am L 2006, c 169, §24]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next